Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2808
Writ; failure to issue; penalty.

If any clerk of the district court shall refuse to issue such writ after allowance and demand made as aforesaid, he shall forfeit to the party aggrieved the sum of five hundred dollars.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 360, p. 806;

R.S.1913, § 9254;

C.S.1922, § 10283;

C.S.1929, § 29-2808;

R.S.1943, § 29-2808.